Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.190

Grants, funds, or gifts—Administration—Utilization of federal funds.

(1) The commission, or the executive director acting on its behalf, is authorized to accept any money or property donated, devised, or bequeathed to the commission, and accept, receive, disburse, and administer grants or other funds or gifts from any source, including private individuals or agencies, the federal government, and other public agencies, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The commission is prohibited from considering any input on the commission's policy decisions or curricula from any person who has donated, devised, or bequeathed property under this section. The commission may determine the value of any property donated, devised, or bequeathed for the purpose of recognizing donations under this section. To the extent feasible, the commission shall coordinate any money or property donated, devised, or bequeathed to the commission with any grant applications or any other sources of funding or gifts.

(3) The services provided by the state through the establishment and maintenance of the programs of the commission are primarily intended for the benefit of the criminal justice agencies of the counties, cities, and towns of this state. To the extent that funds available to the state under the Crime Control Act of 1973 are utilized by the commission, it is the determination of the legislature that, to the maximum extent permitted by federal law, such funds as are so utilized shall be charged against that portion of United States law enforcement assistance administration funds which the state is required to make available to units of local government pursuant to section 303(a)(2) of Part C of the Crime Control Act of 1973.

[ 2024 c 335 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 19.]